Mississippi, session 2026, HB1495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Starkville-Oktibbeha Consolidated School District and Mississippi State University are authorized and empowered, in the discretion of either, to enter into agreements for purposes of collaborating and partnering in the construction, maintenance, or operation of jointly used primary and secondary education facilities on the campus of Mississippi State University or within the school district.  The Starkville-Oktibbeha Consolidated School District and Mississippi State University are further authorized and empowered, in the discretion of either, to transfer funds to the other and expend such funds on mutually agreeable terms and conditions for such purposes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.